Utah statutes.
17-36-53.   Tax stability and trust fund -- Amount in fund limited -- Disposition of excess.

(1)  The total amount in a county's tax stability and trust fund established under Section 17-36-51 shall be limited to the percentage of the total taxable value of property in that county not to exceed the limits provided in the following schedule:

Total Taxable Value		Fund Limits				but not to

Percentage of				  exceed:

Taxable Value

Less than $500,000,000		      1.6%				$5,000,000

From 500,000,000

to 1,500,000,000			      1.0%				  7,500,000

Over 1,500,000,000			        .5%				15,000,000

(2)  If any excess occurs in the tax stability and trust fund over the percentage or maximum dollar amounts specified in Subsection (1), this excess shall be transferred to the general fund of the county and may be used for all purposes as other amounts in the general fund are used.

(3)  If any excess in the fund exists because of a decrease in total taxable value, that excess may remain in the fund, but if the excess amount in the fund is decreased below the limitations of the fund for any reason, the fund limitations established under Subsection (1) apply.

